Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1815
Report; director, probation administrator, or executive director; accept, reject, or request modification; when final; written response; corrected report; credentialing issue; how treated.

(1) Within fifteen business days after a report is presented to the director, the probation administrator, or the executive director under section 50-1814, the director, probation administrator, or executive director may determine whether to accept, reject, or request modification of the recommendations contained in the report. Any response shall be in writing and may include corrections of factual errors. The Inspector General, with input from the Director of Legislative Oversight, may consider any request for modifications but is not obligated to accept such request. Such report shall become final (a) upon the decision of the director, the probation administrator, or the executive director to accept or reject the recommendations in the report, (b) within fifteen business days after the director, the probation administrator, or the executive director requests modifications or after the Inspector General incorporates such modifications, whichever occurs earlier, or (c) fifteen days after the report is presented to the director, the probation administrator, or the executive director if no response is received by the Inspector General. If the Inspector General does not accept a requested modification, the recommendation for which such modification was requested shall be considered to be rejected by the director, probation administrator, or executive director.

(2) After the recommendations have been accepted, rejected, or modified, the report shall be presented to the foster parent, private agency, licensed child care facility, or other provider of child welfare services or juvenile justice services that is the subject of the report and to persons involved in the implementation of the recommendations in the report. Within fifteen business days after receipt of the report, the foster parent, private agency, licensed child care facility, or other provider may submit a written response to the office to correct any factual errors in the report and may determine whether to accept, reject, or request in writing modification of the recommendations contained in the report. The Inspector General, with input from the Director of Legislative Oversight, shall consider all materials submitted under this subsection to determine whether a corrected report shall be issued. If the Inspector General determines that a corrected report is necessary, the corrected report shall be issued within fifteen business days after receipt of the written response.

(3) If the Inspector General does not issue a corrected report pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, or if the corrected report does not address all issues raised in the written response, the foster parent, private agency, licensed child care facility, or other provider may request that its written response, or portions of the response, be appended to the report or corrected report.

(4) A report which raises issues related to credentialing under the Uniform Credentialing Act shall be submitted to the appropriate credentialing board under the act.

Laws 2012, LB821, § 35;

Laws 2015, LB347, § 21;

Laws 2017, LB207, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2024, § 43-4328;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 38.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.